
They should do this to cops that kill people.
There is no part of your wickedness, your craftiness, your outrageousness that's going to deliver you from this. But here is a story of someone who experienced death and lived to tell about it. More importantly, Jonah experienced how to worship when life is at an end.
Wokeism as a spiritual descent from Puritanism
The threat that we must experience death is with all of us, all the time. "No man has power to retain the spirit, or power over the day of death. There is no discharge from [that] war, nor will wickedness deliver those who are given to it" Ecclesiastes 8:8.
The narcissistic rebranding of anecdotal evidence as “lived experience”
And, of course, any religion that goes through enough cycles of “a plague is upon us, what did we do wrong?” will lose the ethics and practices that cause them to act in an existentially risky way.
I think older religious ideologies are virus-proof. But religious ideologies are short-lived anyway.
Acting like something is true is important: this is what "believing in your heart" really means. It's not a propositional knowing. Non-confessors are dancing with God, with ever greater choreography, and the older brother with his correct doctrines is missing this.
The Bible is a one-of-a-kind book in the fact of its very survival. No machinations of any generation so far, with over 150 generations-worth of attempts, has succeeded in irradiating it. Sworn enemies and whole heathen nations act like it is true.
“For just as Jonah was three days and three nights in the belly of the great fish, so will the Son of Man be three days and three nights in the heart of the earth.”
I want to explain why the being-swallowed-by-a-fish miracle is significant and how it leads us to worship God more, given the extensive iconographic history of this story as a symbol of death and resurrection. I'd also like to talk about the significance of the three days.
If you try to explain miracles from a materialist perspective you not only miss the point, but end up with these Rube Goldberg machines like an electroweak quantum tunneling mechanism directing a neutrino beam created just below Jesus’ feet downward to get him to walk on water.
You can calculate the Rt by the difference in cases today vs cases yesterday. So it was actually 5-6 instead of 2-3 THREE MONTHS AGO. It has since fallen below 2.0 everywhere in the US. Is everyone going to go back to hugging and smooching and hanging out in the miasma? No.
I added years to herd immunity to @kevin 's Rt plot. Assuming 90% is a good target (), here is the chart for CT (only 3 more years!) and AK (about 250 years at the present rate):
Can anybody read this? It’s too stylized and obscure for us goyim.
Not understanding probability maps all that much, I would graph the Virology Lab section more like this:
This is @BretWeinstein 's probability map for COVID-19 provenance  I think there isn't that much evidence of chimerism as he does
Stoicism: plan your fears out like you would plan out your goals 
Five Differences Between the Alt-Right and Libertarianism  via @feeonline
"Nationalism does not clash with cosmopolitanism, for the unified nation does not want discord with neighboring peoples, but peace." Mises
The relation between addiction and computing has been out in the open since Pong - as soon as the goal became $$.
#SOCIALISM (n): A cult where success &amp; wealth are declared evil and the followers own failures&amp; poverty are declared noble.
How do I manage to be unpopular on every social media platform and yet worthwhile to everyone I meet in person?
I got white hair on my chest! Now I'm officially old.
I think we are in the midst of a religious war of political religions. Separation of college and State!
This bet should stick to something concrete like UAH Lower Troposphere data:
Warren Buffett's $1M bet will come true at the end of this year. Looks like he's going to win!
In the Wonder Woman theme:
Look! It's not even summer yet and I already have a tan!
Peterson: Neo-Marxism and post-modernism appeal largely to “resentful people,” given the ideologies’ appeal to covetousness and jealousy.
Dissident Professor Explains Neo-Marxism
Herbaceous Peony; Lovely Lady
Kentucky Wisteria; Arizona Babbitt; Pizza Hut
????? ??? ????? Ramadan ad for a kuwaiti telecom company goes boom:
Tomorrow is Ramadan, so I hope everybody is going to go from 5 in the morning to 9 at night without eating or drinking. For a month.
Interesting thought: Vestigiality is Proof of Work (PoW) that somebody somewhere on that level let their simulation run a long time
It's pretty chilly this afternoon - anybody out there enjoying some nice global warming?
My answer to I have 4 months to learn data science/machine learning. What do I do?
Robot Race by Senbei  is the theme song for Sam Charrington's "This Week in Machine Learning &amp; AI" podcast
All the benefits in life come from compound interest.
Check out this book: "Hands-On Machine Learning with Scikit-Learn and TensorFlow..." 
I'm still getting calls for Kevin Marston from Chicopee even though he hasn't owned this phone number since 2009 :-/
I have a jar of "epic" duck fat in my fridge. What? And how?
I trained my dogs by yelling "organic spills cleanup team away!" But now they just watch me when I'm in the kitchen. :-)
Will I be allowed inside a Church if I wear a Muslim hijab?
My son quipped "Man! So liberal I can smell the Medicade!" I'm pining for when the misallocations to the healthcare market were that few.
Is it odd for a non-Jew to eat Kosher?
He has risen!
How do I do a cluster analysis of rows of chronological sequences of events?
San Diego's Experiment With Higher Minimum Wage: 4,000 Fewer Restaurant Jobs
I have a phone alarm that goes off every night (to take pills). So when it goes off, my dog gets in his bed and stays there for the night :)
Where are the US anti-war Democrat protesters? They usually show up after a 4 or 8 year hibernation. Has anyone made any sightings?
Nebraska Dems stuff refugee gift baskets with VOTER REGISTRATION FORMS
“Quis custodiet ipsos custodes?
The US has the best national starvationcare system by hrs waiting in line, hrs filling out paperwork, &amp; $$ to keep someone alive 3 more days
I'd like to introduce a new word, and get your input  via @reddit
Bills have been humanly impossible to read for a while now. Put them on GitHub and let us look at the diffs:
"no person holding any office.. shall, without the consent of the Congress, accept of any ... emolument... from any... foreign state"
Just classify contenders by lifetime total androgens in the body. Gender is subjective and not a good designation.nhttps://t.co/9pinOj1YXd
Never underestimate the power of autistics in large numbers:
I'm in the bottom right and I subscribe to at least one person in each quadrant! Stipulation: you have to be clever.
I propose "ophanocracy" for the word for "rule by robot" - it combines Eze 1:16 with the Federalist #51: "wheel within a wheel"
He quotes Bostrom but misses his argument: goal-seeking robots won't let you turn them off! 
I poured my dog a beer, but he didn't drink it. What am I doing wrong?
A right to repair: why Nebraska farmers are taking on John Deere and Apple
Stop the "arms race" by incentivizing the erstwhile poachers to maintain a breeding stock  #private #property #rights
Wow! This site is “taking the edge off rant mode” by making readers pass a quiz before commenting  via @NiemanLab
Uber journalism is when you get to the point where you can predict what @realDonaldTrump is going to tweet next
Why do some ideologies participate in "outrage olympics" and some don't?
Yo reporters: you know Trump is a binge-watcher of cable news - why not research what was on in addition to of reacting to what was said?
TIL that dark matter can't be grey goo because it would emit black-body radiation. So, no self-replicating spacecraft means we're all alone?
So we were quoted $2500 to replace a catalytic converter and my son did it for $100. We raised him right. :-)
General Michael Hayden, former Director of the NSA and CIA, shares his perspectives on Cyber security.
President of the United States: Declare ANTIFA a terrorist organization - Sign the Petition!  via @Change
All my cat does is sleep nowadays
Dear Mr. Putin, Let's Play Chess  via @wordpressdotcom
I got this on a t-shirt
What were you thinking when you let Obama concentrate so much power in the Executive Branch?
Anybody up for some synonym rolls just like grammar used to make?
Bible Trivia: Which two of these four colors is mentioned in the Bible as the color of the sky? a) Red b) Blue c) Green d) Black
Mimi at the water park:
Hudl preparing for war:
My @Quora answer to Why are so many "Ancaps" so ignorant of what they supposedly hate?
My @Quora answer to Should property rights exist?
IF A PIZZA HAS A RADIUS "Z" AND THICKNESS "A", THEN ITS VOLUME CAN BE DEFINED AS = PI (Z*Z) A
"The United States will come to talk to us when you have a black president and the world has a Latin American pope." Fidel Castro in 1973
The wise individual doesn't get too attached to any of life's pleasures, knowing that science is hard at work proving it's bad for him.
I'll try, thanx
When I was young I espoused conspiracy theories which upset my dad (though he tried not to show it); now my son is returning the favor.
Harvest from one sunflower:
Dutch baby:
Supper looks pretty:
According to Wikipedia, Kazakhstan is majority Christian:
What is the single most important historical event you have witnessed in your entire life?
Will all the Anarcho Capitalists in the Bitcoin space stop posing as lawyers!?!
For you cash-strapped, time-poor middle class out there - what's more important: to do something heroic, or to do something monetize-able?
9' 5" from a sunflower seed:
Cryptolina 2014:
A DAO (Decentralized Autonomous Organization) is now a thing on Wikipedia:  - It's only taken me two years!
The ism in the Bitcoin space is "solutionism" - the belief that every complex problem has a simple, neat, and technological solution.
Poverty in America makes you fat, where all you can afford to eat is subsidized starchy, sugary junk foods.
I'm on Cryptolina's crowdfunding panel:
The volume of the universe is only 8.2E184 cubic planck lengths.
Our cucumber crop. Banana for reference.
Doh! I moved some bitcoins into a Brain Wallet that began with "In the beginning, God..." - it took 3 seconds for someone to steal them.
So, my son has dismantled a car we were given. Now the state wants $500 unless we get it insured! I have to pay so thieves can't fence it?!?
So, how's the $20 trillion War on Poverty going? Will your solution work this time around?
Austrianism provides a good moral vocabulary but doesn't have the predictive accuracy needed for widespread adoption.
Bitcoin is supposed to be an experimental trustless system. Why not celebrate Byronic heroes who understand it well enough to exploit it?
Why can't Abode (or anyone else) convert ligatures to text?
Somebody at work doesn't like my new business card:
I've just updated my professional profile on LinkedIn. Connect with me and view my profile.  #in
This is what the Notre Dame campus looks like after last night's storm:
My hotel room comes with its own iPad.
87% of all women who have ever been alive have descendants who are alive today. For all the men who have ever been, that number is only 34%.
BTW, nobody wished me a happy Father's Day. I will exact my revenge. :-)
Granted, the Son of Man has this quality that causes everyone to narcissistically project (how they want others to see themselves) onto Him.
You who feel Christ's message was Socialism: when he tipped over the money tables, was he pouring half the coins into his garments? Serious.
Here's my #pompously #wordy #indeed #resume -
Here is what it does to the cumulative cases. Granted, the Navajo Nation is partially in New Mexico and Utah.
What am I missing here?
Here are the Navajo numbers as reported in Wikipedia:
Arizona normally looks like this:
I'm suspicious that the wobbles in the real-time basic reproduction number (Rt) are due to the slow-reporting sections of the population. Here, I removed the case reportings of the Navajo Nation from the Rt of Arizona:
"ironed out from the system due to their shoddy performance and long learning curve" - Oh! THAT'S what's happened to me.
Another report from the defense industry: "so compliance focused that the system just doesn't reward future thinking."
I see fiat vs Bitcoin as a kind of Nietzschean Master/Slave morality where the resentment of the lower castes results in a value inversion.
I've come to the conclusion that Bitcoin is "My Little Pony" for anti-central bankers: it's a collectible into a prettier world.
"However, a complete theoretical elucidation needs further investigation." Basically every cool idea I've ever tried to explain to someone.
If you take FBI data for the homicide rate for Blacks, would it cluster with UN data for European rates or African rates? Nature or Nurture?
Another example of the funny math proofs in machine learning: a PAC algorithm is a Probably Approximately Correct algorithm.
Our house is surrounded by drones. HAHA! FOOLED YOU! They're just bees. :-)
I'm listening to Music to Code By on Pandora n #pandora
There's no comparing a bitcoin to the global enabler of terrorism and drug trafficking - the US one hundred dollar bill.
Without the ability to steal money, states couldn't exist.
If I tell you the powerful are oppressing you, you’ll call me a progressive. If I tell you who those people are, you’ll call me a Nazi.
Cigarettes now cost $4.73 a pack. We're spending the equivalent of forty cents a pack on vaping supplies. SUCKERS!!! :-)
The present participle of lose is not loosing.
Politics: the sick game of pretending that YOU aren't doing the corruption/damage/subversion/co-opting, only THEY are.
We uninvited the Russians to our Counter-IED Conference.
Fierce competition among the local caterers to get our business: got a free lunch out of it!
I now have 128 microwheatons on twitter.
Mt Gox is sick:
My lab humps the air to the beat of a certain song.
Capital Gains tax on bitcoins sold in 2013: $666.
Violence is the universal language.
Barley and Buffalo
My answer to How would an anarcho-capitalist system be run?
Screenshot of  running on Vesk in the Citrix Receiver running on my iPhone:
A women should say to a man, before any advice, "I am incapable of imagining how the world must look through testosterone-soaked eyeballs."
Full on snow storm in Williamsburg.
Even if we went back in time to where we were Iron Age kings, we would still have it worse. We have toilets! That must count for something.
The Vape kits:
I've put up a "baby monitor" next to my wife's sick bed: Face Time on both iPhones while I work in another part of the house.
I'm sick of this punky wood! The only decent way to get firewood around here is to wait for hurricane to knock down a giant oak.
"Its not that pointing guns at people is wrong, its just that you have to point them at the right people!" - statists
A consensus is building to delete my Wikipedia article on Decentralized Autonomous Corporations because of a lack of secondary sources.
For High Time Preference Friday we stocked up on some vaping equipment.
One bitcoin is now worth more than one ounce of gold.
My coworkers kids tell her "I love you times the Deficit" because "that's more than infinity" - cute.
Any sufficiently advanced incompetence is indistinguishable from malice.
Bitcoin now transacts more per day than PayPal.
Healthcare used to be an ecology of deeply interdependent charities; you've turned it into an isolated machine in constant need of "fixing".
My TTS app reads "chi^2" as "chee-square" instead of "Kai-squared". Mmm... cheese squares!
My son tells me there's nobody "vulgarizing his utterances" at the homeschool coop like they do at public school where he went last year.
Ace and Pistola!!!! #Halo4GC
I rated Les Misérables 10/10  #IMDb
I think I'll take the summer session off.
So, accidentally sent 4.4 BTC to an address on a wallet on a hard drive I no longer possess. Whoops.
JiffyLube's top-off service is the best way to take care of old, oil-burning vehicles at minimum inconvenience.
Every week or so, I  write these passive-aggressive snippets of code that get discovered in code review. WHY U DO THAT BRAIN?!?
Integer NEQ Int(Integer) Craziness
Earthquake near 23011
Contrast Rebellion - to hell with low-contrast fonts!
Walmart is warning of "serious" inflation ahead in the US market. Thank you, Federal Reserve.
Flipping off a reporter from the back of a police car: you can't teach that. (My son the admirable rascal.)
Jason Segel's humor has taken over the family: now instead of "curse you, tiny toilet!" it's "curse you, tiny Massachussets!" or some such.
: Back in the day, you could sue a railroad for soiling the laundry you hung out to dry. This extension of prope...
A Murder of Crows ~ Full Episode | Nature
Add the Twitter Joke Disclaimer —  — Because you can't be too careful. #twitterjoketrial
Random Script Archive

Statistics Competition: Chess ratings - can we do better than Elo?: Statistics Competition: Chess ratings - can we...

America is the 5th most free nation in the world. Or better.
Israeli students plan counter-flotilla.
Everybody Edits! Great multiplayer flash game.

Chinese report documents human rights disaster in the United States : Indybay: The United States is the only count...
The Cultural and Spiritual Legacy of Fiat Inflation - Jörg Guido Hülsmann - Mises Institute: These effects are 'es...

High fructose corn syrup worse than sugar? | The Money Times: High fructose corn syrup causes more fatness than ta...
Engrish Generator

I wish there was a good Chinese buffet near Hampton, VA.


JSConf.US 2010 -- Swashbucklin' JavaScript!: JSCONF is currently sold out. We are working with sponsors and speake...




Critical Issues Commentary: Colossian Heresy Part 1: Bondage to the stoicheia comes in forms that are cleverly dis...

Academics fight rise of creationism at universities | World news | The Guardian: A growing number of science stude...
Christopher Blizzard · HTML5 video and H.264 – what history tells us and why we’re standing with the web: Christop...


wonders if a Republican uses the word "black" in a sentence and a liberal doesn't hear him, is he still a racist?
Fun $10 puzzle game

Is Owning a Dog Worse than Owning an SUV? - GOOD Blog - GOOD: Is Owning a Dog Worse than Owning an SUV? - GOOD Blog...


28 Rich Data Visualization Tools - InsideRIA
Gateway Pundit: Gateway Pundit: "Jimmy Carter: Abuse of Women Including Genital Mutilation is the Fault of Catholic...
Found a voting attendant that asks you if you want a Republican or Democrat ballot and then calls you a traitor if you choose Republican!
The Fiction Of Climate Science - Forbes.com: The Fiction Of Climate Science - Forbes.com:  Al Gore thought he might...
The sovereign Lord of the earth and sky Puts camels through a needle’s eye. And if his wisdom see it mete, He will put worlds inside a tweet
2012 had a clear message: if you pray, you die.



Seriously thinking about making my S-Corp completely controlled and owned by my wife so that it qualifies as a minority owned business.
Recipe Puppy is an ingredient based recipe search engine.














Whenever I create a new object in FarCry with an array field, the MySQL table is missing that "a" field. I have to add the field manually.












I'm getting an "unexpected constant #2 102" error when I try to access /CFIDE/administrator/index.cfm - any ideas?




The HP Photosmart Premium gives an unknown error when trying to print from the browser of an HP laptop. And bombs the spooler elsewhere. :-(
Working from home for too long - I need some Keow Teow Goreng, a coffee stout, and the company of intelligent programmers. :-)




I'm working on some CF for SFA.




RIA CFML Flex Flash: Do Coldfusion programmers need to be object oriented gurus?: RIA CFML Flex Flash: Do ColdFu..
SitePoint are having another #twitaway. Get your free book here!

Just uploaded all the photos from my senior yearbook to Facebook - I'm exposing my friends to the jokes of their children all at once! :-)




Anaface - Facial Beauty Analysis - Score Your Face -
9
Last time I went to the Grand Canyon I fainted from lack of oxygen. Been living at sea level far too long.
Arriving in Flagstaff around 3:30pm on the 21st of August.
Software Is Hard: Software Is Hard: The developer is God of a virtual world, and it's hard work being God. Not a..
Violent video games linked to child aggression - CNN.com: Violent video games linked to child aggression - CNN.c..
I've discovered you can get unimplemented functionality out of CF Builder by borrowing .project files from Eclipse!
It says I "will need to produce and logically explain code samples during the interview" - I hope that means my own.
Just like some drinks taste awful when not cold, some music sounds awful when the volume is not turned up enough. This might explain why those nearby don’t like your music.
"This sort of work is best done by the insurance sector. Insurers employ modellers and data scientists, but also employ managers whose job is to decide whether a model is accurate enough for real world usage."

4) Participatory knowing involves a complex interplay between agent and arena in a creative and enacting sense. I think this is what is meant by "believe in your heart that God raised [Jesus] from the dead" Romans 10:9.
3) Propositional knowing refers to knowing via language and mathematics. It includes facts and logic and allows you to argue on Twitter.
2) Perspectival knowing is done through embodied perception: knowing your place in the world and your own point of view.
1) Procedural knowing is having the muscle and sequence memory to enact a procedure. (I never do routines the same way twice: this includes the morning routine where I should be tying my shoes in a certain sequence.)
We turn to do an end run around the entire Industrial Revolution
Now, the question is, would the trigger-happy Clinton have made a better preparation for the pandemic, or would she succumb to the "fear of the virus is racism" narrative that the Woke were pushing?
"Instead of finding these [our own institutional] forms, we have applied our skill and invention in such a manner as to give a fresh leash of life to many of the obsolete capitalist and militarist institutions of the older period." Mumford, Technics and Civilization, p. 267

"Mrs. Clinton had refused to talk to the president for eight months after the Monica Lewinsky scandal broke. She resumed talking to her husband only when she phoned him and urged him in the strongest terms to begin bombing Serbia; the president began bombing within 24 hours."

Still unable to find ColdFusion work - falling off the cliff at the end of the month. :-(
I just took "What's Your Bible IQ?" and got: Bible Scholar! Try it ?
I just took "Which television series do you belong in?" and got: Grey's Anatomy! Try it ?
Jordan Chandler “I Lied for my father, i’m sorry Michael” | Fresh News: Jordan Chandler “I Lied for my father, i..
heard a funny T9 (predictive text): thumbing in "Zach Schortmann" causes my son's phone to suggest "Wack Painstoan"! :-D
#freeflexbuilder3 from @richtretola
Celebrate 10 years of Moonfruit and win a MacBook Pro  #moonfruit
All American Investor: Real Unemployment Jumps to 16.8 Percent (Statistics, Graph): All American Investor: Real ..
Get a free iPhone from #squarespace if you can remember to go to their website.
DON'T GET THAT COLLEGE DEGREE! - New York Post: DON&#39;T GET THAT COLLEGE DEGREE! - New York Post: The four-yea..
China Bans Gold Farming -- InformationWeek: China Bans Gold Farming -- InformationWeek: Trading virtual goods fo..
Just came out of PetCo to this "tourch and pitchfork" crowd around my car where I'd left my dog, not even panting she was so ventilated.
Will some ColdFusion expert please spend some time on Wikipedia cleaning up the CFML articles?
Is Windows Vista supposed to be like this? Everything is slow and buggy.
Bailout Costs vs Big Historical Events | The Big Picture: Bailout Costs vs Big Historical Events | The Big Pictu..
Kristen Schofield's Blog: Analysts at Gartner Praise CF: Kristen Schofield&#39;s Blog: Analysts at Gartner Prais..
Public Bugbase!!!! Track your own gripes ladies and gents.
Bolt public beta soon; public release in the year 9.
Supposedly Bolt is going to be more like HomeSite than CFEclipse is.
Mmmm... using Excel as a datasource with cfspreadsheet. :-)
cf:mail without the rote #coldfusion code.
Creativity over Convention.
Evans Data Corp says the number of #coldfusion developers have tripled since the year 4.
The next ColdFusion code name is Niff!!!!! jk
The Beatles Rock Band - “The Beatles” - Passion Pictures: The Beatles Rock Band - “The Beatles” - Passion Pictures
Great times with my 12-year-old playing video games.
The New Socialism: Global Collectivist Society Is Coming Online: The New Socialism: Global Collectivist Society ..
java, javascript, actionscript, coldfusion Job Trends | Indeed.com: java, javascript, actionscript, coldfusion J..
Recommended wordspy 'you can learn new tricky phrases by following wordspy.'  #TellMrTweet
Recommended cfjedimaster 'he is a highly responsive ColdFusion/Flex experimenter.'  #TellMrTweet
Unemployment numbers worse than projected | Les Jones: Unemployment numbers worse than projected | Les Jones: Th..
Playing with the Look-alike Meter
An interactive map of vanishing employment across the country. - By Chris Wilson - Slate Magazine: An interactiv..
Freddie Mac CFO David Kellermann found dead - Apr. 22, 2009: Freddie Mac CFO David Kellermann found dead - Apr. ..
Babbittize me!
I joined twitter 772 days ago -  ?
Just discovered I didn't e-file my taxes when I thought I e-filed my taxes. I am in e-trouble! :-((
Another week without work.
Complaining about being overworked to the unemployed is like making them listen to a skinny person complain about their weight problems.
Complaining about being overworked to the unemployed is like having to listen to a skinny person complain about their weight problems.
Successfully set up a second wireless router in client mode!!!
Successfully set up a send wireless router in client mode.
I think all my ajax/web 2.0 skills have been ruined by working for this one company for three years. :-(
Having configured my facebook app, I can't figure out how to proceed - any good videos out there?
My spammer is Amy Fitch @ 800-829-6468 Ext 1241 (but don't be mean or anything)
Converting a Javascript OOP project to ColdFusion so that it will work as a facebook app.
wefollow isn't case sensitive! Whew!
Just added myself to the  twitter directory under:  #ColdFusion #anarchocapitalism #communities
I've been cut back to 16 hours max a week at my largest client. :-(
is having tea with his niece! :-)
is getting download speeds 10x faster than with the old cable modem. Is this just temporary?
expects negative questions to be answered logically - and gets totally confused when they're not.
is dumbing down the definition of "it snowed" to add "and it was still there the next day".
is in denial that it's snowing right now. (Please don't pop his delusional bubble. ;-)
is proud of his son for getting all A's. Didn't know he had it in him! :-)
Is trying to write a custom struts filter to do the extended character encoding for his web site.
is playing scrabble with Barb and Mimi.
is at work so early that the coffee shop isn't even open. :o)
I'm looking at the Ginx Pre-alpha home page.
Can't get my WebDriver tests to run in TestMaker. :-((
Trying to keep my FFS pets from being bought out from under me.
We need, not a French Revolution, but an Austrian one. That is, one of Austrian economics.
I'm on the ground.
Taking the early train home to transfer the title to the car to my son.
Struggling with the buggy PushToTest TestMaker software.
Any body use PushToTest?
Still trying to find a good web test builder.
I should've wrote this test suite BEFORE I converted this app from ColdFusion.
I wrote a really sweet GUI test suit, found all the bugs, etc.
Does anybody know of an open source card game written in Flash?
Everything outside is covered with slick, thick, ice.
Nodding off in church.
This semester's Sunday School is Ecclesiastes
Spending all day creating TestGen4Web tests.
iuggtkod
Working from home again today. Too cold and snowy to bother driving in.
New goal: reorganize the basement.
I just realized it was the New Year 1 hour after the celebration was supposed to happen.
Going home from the party.
Hi Mimi! :-)
I always get goal-oriented this time of year:
How do I get twitter to message my phone? I can send an IM to 40404 but how do I receive one? Setting Device updates to "on" has no effect.
Let's just say he has a divine special exemption to the Golden Rule. Or so he thinks.
Still can't get a .jar file to run from a command line - I had to partially "explode" it.
Trying to get a .jar file I created to run from a command line. Never created a jar file before, never written in Java before, etc. :-(
Called my co-worker a "fucking hypocrite" at the top of my lungs. Now I have to live with the regrets. Who cares if he deserved it or not.
Brought home three thick Java books. Why? I didn't even look at them and have to drag them back to work again.
Havasupai has been flooded by a earthen dam breaking. My father was the tribe's lawyer and I used to go down there a lot as a child.
I've never quite got my "career portfolio" dressed up enough to take out in public.
I'm working my way through Eben Hewitt's "Java for ColdFusion Developers" like I've never read it before.
There has never been anything like this olympic opening ceremony.
This floor show is absolutely incredible!
Watching the Olympics.
I'm looking for more ColdFusion work.
What's up?
ColdFusion
I'm driving right now. I will respond in a minute.
Typing on my computer.

AlsonnE. ChildrennF. People wearing masks
Which group is most likely to just enter uninvited into your 6 foot radius of personal space?
All these protective social instincts we built up over time (xenophobia, etc.), now so repulsive to postmodern sensibilities, turn out to have been guarding us from worse monsters. We thought Cerberus was ugly, but we didn't appreciate how he kept back the Hoards of Death.
Can I just say that human tribes have evolved adaptive social behaviors to survive epidemics? A lot of these are repugnant to modern sensibilities (xenophobia, etc.), but they are there, buried deep, not completely eradicated.
“Of all tyrannies, a tyranny sincerely exercised for the good of its victims may be the most oppressive.” C. S. Lewis
Coronavirus Pandemic (week of April 19): number of confirmed cases passes 2 million worldwide
Coronavirus Pandemic (week of March 29): global cases reach 500,000nOil Price War (week of April 05): price falls  to the lowest level since November 2002nCoronavirus Pandemic (week of April 12): death toll exceeds 100,000 globally
Coronavirus Pandemic (week of March 08): Italy places 16 million people in quarantinenCoronavirus Pandemic (week of March 15): WHO declares the outbreak a pandemicnCoronavirus Pandemic (week of March 22): worldwide death toll surpasses 10,000
Chicago Cubs World Series (week of November 06): end of longest championship drought in American sports historynHurricane Harvey (week of August 27): total damage reaches $125 billionnHurricane Dorian (week of September 22): widespread stench of rotting bodies 3 weeks later


Even if you take into account a more quadratic measure of population density, there is no correlation between how fast authoritarian measures were taken and the cumulative deaths that resulted. Nobody in government is actually making you safer.
This calculation is so easy even I could do it
I'm going with the guy on the ground (who has skin in the game) and has tested 5,213 patients. Let's all develop strong immune systems (and stop playing into the hands of our enemies)!
A debt Jubilee is not a target (a scapegoat to vent our righteous anger on), it's a better way to live. It's not "find the bad guy" - that kind of thing is easily manipulable.
Is this pretty enough?
Righteous anger is like a sword thrust. In fact, the problem with most anger is that it’s not righteous enough! It’s easily parried by manipulative forces to focus on the wrong object: the scapegoat.
Looking at statistical terms makes me wonder what even they were getting at back then. Coefficient of Determination? Sounds like something you'd put on a medicine bottle label in 1910.
The invaders need to be repelled in a decentralized fashion anyway. Keeping the reproduction rate down in the area of each hospital below 1.0, etc.

Ramadan was developed during a period saturated with epidemics and starvation. Enjoying the replies to this ignorant comment:
I predict this crisis will end in 2029 (but only if you consider the crisis to have begun in 2008)
This is a bad take. Libertarians want a market for governance mechanisms. Any mechanism that prevents "fucking someone's life up" according to personal, subjective valuation would be included in that market.
I think it's because we live in a scientifically- and economically-illiterate era, where the only tools available assume that something is only true if enough people believe it's true.
I remember people's names if I see their names every day.
Are there any decentralized governance mechanisms (ophanocracies) that can help with the coming food riots? It's one of my goals this year. Maybe one of the cryptocurrency communities has something ready?
Who led the digital transformation of your company?

 output reminds me of a politician parrying an interviewer. Maybe we could train it on political interview data and throw it back in their faces.
This should work well in Grievance Studies assignments
There is no correlation between how early US states locked down and cumulative deaths, even when you account for population density

One dimension: Coding, Audio podcastsnTwo dimensions: Web page layouts, Youtube videosnThree dimensions: VRnInfinite dimensions: ???
This can happen; we just have to get the ophanocracies to minimum viable product.
Question: There is an argument that the number of deaths attributed to COVID-19 is wrong by a large proportion. Okay, if the number of deaths is doubling every few days, that means the number of wrongly-attributed deaths is also doubling. What is causing those deaths to double?
What you are doing is conspiring to forge a chain of infections that ends in unnecessary suffering and death. (I am not even going to get into the logistics of sharing the Eucharist.)
Can I get something off my chest? Celebrating Easter in a crowd without everyone wearing masks and washing their hands to and from is not "peaceably assembling" and is not constitutionally protected nor striving "for peace with everyone" in accordance with Hebrews 12:14.
“God chose what is low and despised in the world, even things that are not, to bring to nothing things that are, so that no human being  might boast in the presence of God.” ?1 Corinthians 1:28-29
We should, in concert with Ottawa, London, Brussels, and Tokyo, repudiate our debt to them. China is holding more than a trillion dollars worth of US Treasury bills, for instance.
China fumbled a precursor in their Wuhan bioweapons lab so they decided to level the playing field by 1) lying about human-to-human transmissibility and 2) playing on the "fear of the Chinese virus is racism" narrative to infect the rest of the world.
This is a reasonable definition of "peaceable assembly".


I'd like to see a graph of book-feet of regulations for each of these.
I have made a habit of doing this. I admit that I’m not a cogent thinker, and this habit is pretty saddening.
"At the end of this, there will still be Goldmans and Reeds, people who admit errors and those who will stick by their guns, humble minds who will see that there were better ways and arrogant fools who will keep screaming that setting the world on fire was all we could do."

Trump's Biggest Failure
Because their cronies would lose the benefits of the Cantillion Effect
Chess is mutual puzzle-solving in the presence of adversaries.
Imagine trying to forgive all Whites and Jews for the way they got your family into this country and rationalized it as no big deal.
I would prefer you define non-"peaceable assembly" as not wearing masks during, and not washing hands coming from and going to, a social assembly. Instead, you'll have some ham-fisted authoritarianism where you chaise down masked joggers and such.
Racism and xenophobia are evolutionarily adaptive mechanisms to fight pandemics on a tribal scale (and are therefore hard to remove).


A stream of revenue large enough to finance armed groups cannot be extracted by any legitimate nonviolent enterprise? Enter the Warlord Entrepreneurs. A categorical imperative cannot pronounce an action "as good in itself" no matter what the result? Enter the Moral Entrepreneurs.
The larger demons have been let loose in the world. (The smaller demons of Xenophobia and Bigotry, who like Cerberus, have been guarding the gates of the Underworld to prevent them from leaving, have been cleared out of the way.)
In this era of crisis, where cause/effect relationships are not perceivable (and where hindsight biases our post-accident assessments of human performance), our collective lizard-brain mode is going to kick in.nn?? ACT ? SENSE ? RESPOND
From "How Complex Systems Fail" ():nn8) Hindsight biases post-accident assessments of human performance.nnand most importantly:nn10) All practitioner actions are gambles.nnEven successful outcomes are the result of gambles.

How about putting out a projection with the warning "this is a self-defeating prophecy"?
This is the first time I've ever heard of "Tiger King"


I've been working from home for decades but my wife has not. She is having a real hard time self-motivating, but has finally turned a corner, I think. :-)
I am positive this is an esthetic improvement
I got lazy and used staples
I sewed a ? in the nose bridge for structural support

Here’s one of the sleeves and the collar cut out
I plan to sacrifice my ISS shirt for the cause!
One thing I have a lot of to make DIY PPE with is t-shirts!
As long as you are washing your hands and wearing masks, it’s “peaceably assembling”


How to catch out lying bureaucrats

Crowds are  good way to infect other nations
Well, I've discovered that the heartburn that completely disappeared on my carnivore diet comes back whenever I eat pizza.




"Given Chi's speech, is the novel coronavirus outbreak in Wuhan an accident occasioned by weaponizing the virus in [the Wuhan P4 virology] lab?"
As a habit, I used to place my forehead on the desk and read from my lap in Nuclear Power School. Some midwit on a power trip came over and yelled at me. I was so disgusted I faked like I was asleep even though everyone around me could see me turn the pages and blink my eyes.
Happened again this year.

Does this group suffer the Dunning-Krueger effect the most?
Are "midwits" the same group as the @nntaleb "IYIs" or Einstein's "intelligent fool"?

Collectivist societies adapted to higher pathogenic density have an easier time implementing mask-wearing norms than do individualist societies
I think #skininthegame is going to transform the worldview of our leaders
Did they set up the WHO to be ruled by a bunch of presumptuous and ruthless Boomers?
Can we actually have a removal of regulations against tests and masks production?

The conspiracy theory is that the Wuhan biolab fumbled a precursor so the Powers operationalized the plan earlier than expected
The Plague Gods are rising up to devour humanity
Same with "Capitalism". And "Socialism" for that matter.
"For I will pass through the land of Egypt that night, and I will strike all the firstborn in the land of Egypt, both man and beast; and on all the gods of Egypt I will execute judgments: I am the Lord."
Have the freedom to take on as much responsibility as you can.
The Italian-heavy New York is also disproportionally affected. The viral monster took the Spice Road (China, Iran, Italy) and then on to the Italian diaspora.
From How Complex Systems Fail (): "Hindsight biases post-accident assessments of human performance."

They should have studied past pandemics: 
The Lord's Prayer packs in a lot of information
Same old Boomer solutions: centralized governance mechanisms need to be tweaked
From Wikipedia: "The existence of heteroscedasticity is a major concern in the application of regression analysis,... as it can invalidate statistical tests of significance that assume that the modelling errors are uncorrelated and uniform..."
The line between the West and the rest is the "doubling every four days" line
In this "land war" all the Asian trajectories are looking good:
Why not, if you can afford the losses?
Why did the robot spill the beans? Did I naively set this up years ago?
It's my #Twitterversary! I have been on Twitter for 13 years, since 17 Mar 2007 (via @twi_age).
The Hammer should come down on my paycheck-to-paycheck renter, who won’t then be paying his rent, etc. Should I just preemptively bring the Hammer down on the mortgage company, and do the legal Dance with them as they try to foreclose?
I’m now playing out, in my head, how to perform the Hammer and the Dance economically in my personal life, as I’m expecting my renter and my employer (and my renter’s employer) to do the same.
When I see myself in CCTV or video conferencing software I get this unnerving feeling of horror. Anyone else can’t shake a feeling like this? I don’t think it’s vanity. My father used to get this when they interviewed him on TV. And my adult son also dislikes his own visage.
All Beltway Bureaucrats need to get tested ASAP! They are probably all infected.
Stay home, wash your hands, or watch your hospital run out of ICUs and ventilators.
The cumulative number of deaths in the US is doubling every 4.3 days. By May Day, overfitting to the curve, we should have twenty three million.
If you supported regulations on hospitals that require them to only use medical grade masks, you are the reason masks are not available, not Trump.
It also has the property of being consciousness-raising, as the next time they look in the mirror they will see all the smudges on their face.
Idea: coat the hands of the people who enter your home with a non-toxic, (possibly) delayed-visibility dust. It makes it easier to see where they left their fingerprints and where you need to wipe down.
I recommend a non-violent underthrow starting with local replacements, given the relaxation of local law enforcement.
I know a lot of us on Social Media like to debate ideals, but it's time to admit that our institutions are completely eroded and are not going to come back online. And so there is a need to found new institutions and champion the ideals that work for all of us.
Do you know actual reason central banks don't favor helicopter money as a monetary policy? It's not the inflationary effect or the unwise spending. It prevents their cronies from benefiting from the Cantillion Effect and maintaining their elite status long term.
I re-estimate it at 14,587.
2020 Goals:n1. Glorify God and enjoy Himn2. Flip the Cosmological Constant with my stock of anti-baryonsn3. Get humanity through the next Great Filtern4. Prevent a WWII-like memetic contagion from happening this saeculumn5. Found ophanocracies to ameliorate wage-slave riots
Based on the dataset from  I estimate that there are 4,910 confirmed COVID-19 cases being ventilated right now.
Here's the choke point: the number of people trained to operate medical ventilators.
Statistics is littered with these, to the point that it's almost impossible to understand what they were getting at a century ago.
Remember it was the experts who told you "don't panic". We need to develop decentralized governance mechanisms (ophanocracies) that don't need experts to function.
The company should go full anarchocapitalist and loudly dare the FDA to punish them for shipping
Americans don’t panic, their ingenuity just kicks in. These narcissistic, presumptuous Boomers lack a Fear of God and have wrung all the resilience out of the system in the name of efficiency. Now the sentimental, indecisive Silents are trying to mollify us with lies.
Exactly. A spike in the demand for toilet paper will be followed by a dip in demand. We aren’t doubling in the number of butts.
We politely inquire at the entrance of our home (the mud room) about the health of our guests and their housemates, then direct them to the soap and water in the adjacent restroom to wash their hands.
Walmart: toilet paper aisle
New data makes it more infectious than SARS:
I’m “West Side Story” years old.
I had the privilege of voting for Vermin Supreme in the Massachusetts primary last night.
“As he went away from there, the scribes and the Pharisees began to press him hard and to provoke him to speak about many things, lying in wait for him, to catch him in something he might say.” Sounds like Twitter.
Not as deadly as the Spanish flu and not as infectious as the Hong Kong flu
Looks like another flu
Que the global financial crisis:

This is what the traffic in Beijing look like right now. They are all doing the right thing and working/schooling from home:
Been on a strict 5-ingredient diet (beef, pork, chicken, salt, and water) for two weeks now and for the first time in 3 decades a rash that covered my skin from shoulders to feet is gone.
You could “poke” the screen memory and “peak” at the keyboard buffer to create an infinite loop of white patterns across a black or green background
Divorce doubles the probability that children will be living below the poverty line. Every woman I told this to when I was younger thought their children would be the exception.
It’s the kids grandparents we are trying to protect, not the kids. So let them peaceably assemble (hand washing, masks, etc.)
And the fact that they don’t even bother to find the stuff stolen from you reveals what?

It’s as intractable as language: everyone is born with the capacity for it and will pick it up from their cohorts.
This is hard. You go through stages of grief when you find out they’re right. But if you keep going, you eventually come out the other side with a transcendent, holistic understanding that does more than just clean up your argument.
I’d be happy to find one among the economic justice tribes (the Dirtbag Left, Occupy, the DSA) who understands this concept
Another example of partitive exegesis would be reading Matthew 17:17 and seeing Jesus [in his human nature] having run his empathetic battery dry.
“Surely vexation kills the fool, and jealousy slays the simple.” Job 5:2. It seems like most of the political energy out there is peevish envy. But, whatever you do, don’t let the fire go out completely.
I think that God cannot be contained in a metaphorical box correctly labeled “Things that Exist”. That being said, there is strong empirical evidence that acting like God exists is adaptive behavior.
Okay, it was just who was mentioned in the summary. This was all done programmatically, so ymmv.
Here I scraped the Wikipedia "Calvinism" page and modified the SVG diagram on said page with the timeline of each person mentioned. Notice the gap? Looks like they entirely ignored the Puritan movement.
An opensource timekeeper with wristband
MY VIRTUAL REALITY GLASSES THAT IS... HAHAHA!! No, but I can imagine the kind of culture shock we will experience as we become VR natives.
I've been working from home, living in social media so long I feel like Pinocchio half-transformed into a donkey. Indeed, I wandered around so long this morning with my phone in my face I didn't realize I forgot to put my glasses on.
Antisemitism is the sign your ideology has gone off the deep end. Standing in principled solidarity with Israel will get you through to the end.
Did post-WWII Germany spend billions on re-education?
2020 Goals:n1. Glorify God and enjoy Himn2. Build up my stock of anti-baryonsn3. Get humanity through the next Great Filtern4. Prevent a WWII-like memetic contagion from happening this saeculumn5. Develop the ophanocracies that would realize the dreams of both Left and Right

Hot take from today’s sermon: God describes your spiritual condition the way your boss describes the condition of your employment when he says “you’re fired”.
Also, when asked what I would prefer to be called, I confess I would love to be called "Babbitt". Apparently, being referred to by your last name is problematic and no one can quite overcome the social taboos against that.
In my fifties, that stopped bothering me. Looking at my patriline, there's not much recreational baby-naming going on, just a lot of recycling. The names of my ancestors are not "deadnames", just a gift of their parents. Then there's nicknames, which you also can't give yourself.
When I was 16 I changed my name to Dave. All my documents - passport, social security card, except my birth certificate - say Dave (no middle name) Babbitt. My biggest problem? Sometimes people decide that I meant to spell it D-a-v-i-d.
The disagreeable introvert, on the other hand, can maintain concentration by refusing to verbally change gears, forcing the deft conversationalist to become a sounding board. 44
But to the programmer who has already got max balls in the air, catching a few more requires dropping the few they already have, then spending 15 minutes getting back up to speed, which lowers their productivity. 3
To someone who can deftly handle a conversation, relating to these programmers while they are working seems like it shouldn't be too taxing: they're just throwing them a few balls and expecting even less to be thrown back. 2
I think I know why the first great programmers were disagreeable introverts. I good programmer keeps, like, 17 concept-balls in the air before finally typing something out. Same with a good organizer, except catching and relaunching the balls requires conversation. /1
People like this neither know nor care how many people are escaping poverty every day (a 75% reduction in 32 short years). When they were looking into their brother’s food bowl, it wasn’t to ensure they had enough, it was to enviously complain if they had too much.
I recorded everything positive and negative that happened during the week for 2019. Here’s the cumulative score:
Sex is a deeply enmeshed and entangled part of the human condition: it’s directly connected to children, disease, and betrayal. Even indirect connections like gender identity and religious sexual purity laws are a hairball, with ample opportunities for the power hungry to harvest
How do you get everybody on board with this? They're dealing with fear of ego loss, and you're trying to get them to fail faster.
Try Sunday School, I guess? We have questions from both Buddhist and Atheist perspectives answered there.
My holiday tradition is to put four uncut chestnuts into the microwave for sixty seconds on high
This was so disappointing 
Would everybody with antibaryons please annihilate as many baryons as you can so we can force the Higgs field to its absolute vacuum? We need to somehow cancel the positive cosmological constant and force this universe to collapse, baby.
Working out the logistics wouldn't be very hard - she would have the same phone number I'd put to memory and so it would be easy to get in touch with her. And the disappointment this produced helped me realize what responsibility towards her I was shirking in the here and now.
I have this stubborn retro-incarnation fantasy I've mulled over my entire post-junior-high life. It's established itself as an escape from all my big mistakes. I shared it with my wife and encouraged her to join in on the fantasy of going back to your childhood and repenting.
Confessions:
I am thankful for:nn1) The world being “full of the knowledge of the LORD, as the waters cover the sea” in the form of Human Rights, Secularism, and other Christian inventions.
*ideologues
Partisans, when arguing against a cognitively-distant ideology: "That will never work! It'll just create a hierarchy with sociopaths on the top, clueless ideologies in the middle, and losers at the bottom!"nEvery hierarchy:
The average American citizen has been to 12 states 
An important methodology for the Dynasty Startup Kit
Pretty good correlation as far as country statistics go. Data sources:  and 
Jesus answered him, “You would have no authority over me at all unless it had been given you from above. Therefore he who delivered me over to you has the greater sin.” John 19:11
We’ve gone from actually solving problems to “virtue beliefs” that signal at others’ expense
I in no wise disappoint my 18-year-old self. He just didn’t consider saving for the future as that important
I’m taking the plunge (cooking steak for my daily meal) starting tomorrow
Here I recommend five why’s to establish a minimum viable feel-desired-gesture to start negotiations with. Then fight it out. Encourage him to do the same.
Will we get to the point where we morally condemn the drowning man for pulling down into the water those who are trying to save him? If not, will we get back to the point where we condemn the irresponsible ejaculation more than the abortion attempt?
The coolest quote is "The prefrontal cortex is represented by the Logos... while the paleomammalian brain is represented by the Old Testament God, and... the basal ganglia (reptile brain) is represented by the warring pagan gods." Brilliant!
Probably the lesson here is don't try to school someone on tangential details in a passionate manner. 4/
I think a better way to look at it is in Luke 22:35-38, which is more in line with the article anyway. 3/
Turning the other cheek is offering to be slapped a second time, but Garret Dailey (@Libera_Rex) and maybe Steafan Fox seem to equate it with Ahimsa. He gives a scenario where this Ahimsa-by-another-name violates Psalm 82:3-4, and concludes he cannot call himself a Christian. 2/
The Adversary  via @mrdoitdailey is mostly well-written and a much-needed emphasis. Listening to it in the background got me triggered on a misunderstanding of the phrase "turn the other cheek", though. So I replied hastily and got blocked. 1/
I've got to figure out how to turn my Dynasty Startup Kit into a DAO
Is our POTUS celebrating currency debasement here?
I've had conversations with my father about how I would like to have a life that my grandfather's grandfather would be proud of. It turns out that my father is my nemesis and doesn't want that happening.
Bitcoin implies omni competence
We need to nationalize the starvationcare system!
By my calculations bacteria ? have been evolving for sixty trillion generations since the dinosaurs ? went extinct. That’s a lot of free lunches at the expense of the fauna that evolved along with them. I don’t see how Jurassic Park could be viable.
FOCTM: Fear Of Caring Too Much
But he said to me, "My grace is sufficient for you, for my power is made perfect in weakness". Therefore I will boast all the more gladly about my weaknesses, so that Christ’s power may rest on me.
The Gospels are a series of hard-to-fake virtual signals on the part of Jesus for his examination as the spotless Lamb of God
This rule violates scope and so I've made an executive decision never to follow it.
If you produce a lot of engaging content, you had better be completely honest, or the world will find out and your enterprise will come crashing down.
So I lifted my head and hands, and kind of paraphrased Job 42:1-6. But each time, at the start of my ramblings, I woke up. 5/
Yet here I was in the middle, like this was the plan all along, and the blackness of death was about to rip open to expose me to the Judgement of my Ideals. If such a thin veil separates me from Glory, I thought, shouldn't I reconsider all my complaining? 4/
To the right of me was a wealthy (but stagnant) version of me who had saved for the future and didn't suffer as I was because he was able to buy whatever medical science could offer to alleviate his pain. I felt great envy, self-pity and embarrassment just at the sight of him. 3/
To my left was a teenage version of me, not preparing for this future of pain by good diet and exercise. I felt such indignation I wanted to reach over and smack him upside the head! 2/
I had this dream repeated over a few nights. I dreamed I was standing in total blackness. In front of me was a 3D model of just pinpricks of white where the arthritis was attacking the joints in my hip and coccyx. The pain had a fatal element to it - I felt I was ready to die. 1/
During an awakening, the sense of greatest need is to fix the Inner World. That is not what is happening right now.
The difference between compassion and kindness is this: if you get between a mother bear and her cubs it is her compassion (for her cubs) that would cause her to rend your flesh. It would be a kindness to just call a general retreat. Never depend on the kindness of strange bears.
‘It was during that campaign that the Soviet catchphrase “ne chital, no osuzhdayu”—“didn’t read, but disapprove”—was born: Pasternak’s accusers had coined it to protect themselves against suspicions of having come in contact with the seditious material.’
“Twitter seems to exist primarily for the purpose of generating mobs—composed primarily of individuals who are hungry for the opportunity to taste blood and bask in the joys of reasonably risk-free reputation destruction, revenge and self-righteousness.”
True compassion is always costly
Let the fact-resistant remain fact resistant. (Interpreted as the era the prophecy is referring to is not one of spiritual growth, but of harvest.)
Let the evildoer still do evil, and the filthy still be filthy, and the righteous still do right, and the holy still be holy.nnRevelations 22:11
This is basically what happens when you send your kids off to college
A Comprehensive Reboot of Law Enforcement - Eliezer Yudkowsky - Medium
“To be able to destroy with good conscience, to be able to behave badly and call your bad behavior 'righteous indignation' — this is the height of psychological luxury, the most delicious of moral treats.”nn? Aldous Huxley, Crome Yellow
“The surest way to work up a crusade in favor of some good cause is to promise people they will have a chance of maltreating someone.”nn? Aldous Huxley, Crome Yellow
“Of course God no longer intends to destroy the city once the foreigners have repented, and because the city is made akin to the fish and to Jonah’s three days, it is almost as if the prayer Jonah made becomes the prayer of the city itself by which it is saved.” @PageauJonathan
“And should not I pity Nineveh, that great city, in which there are more than 120,000 persons who do not know their right hand from their left, and also much cattle?”
So God relents, Jonah is all “I’M SO ANGRY!!” And God’s response is something like “is this the appropriate behavior?”.nnAnd then Jonah watches to see what will happen?!?nnThis is self-therapy. He has an unsatisfied tulpa; his inner  #burnbabyburn can’t be satisfied
git: ‘gud’ is not a git command. See ‘git --help’
See? Transparency is required in a transparent society. "That level of secrecy is likely to have contributed to the decision to deploy them: with everyone refusing to acknowledge their existence, it might pass under the radar."
If I was only allowed...nnOne cuisine: Mexican nOne author: @vgrnOne genre of music: violin/EDM fusionnOne TV show: OffnOne place: Puerto PeñasconOne season: FallnOne city: FlagstaffnOne game: DnDnOne book of the Bible: IsaiahnOne movie: Incrediblesnn...how about you?
When we were younger, my wife and I used to take online IQ tests together. She would be all “This is so hard! I’m doing so terrible!” I would be all “No sweat! I got this!” She would consistently get ten points higher than me. ?????
When I was younger, I fought against the common refrain that Republicans were the party of the rich by pointing out that all my rich relatives were Democrats
The “pocket-sized god” you can pull out when you want to complain about its logical inconsistencies, unwillingness to obey physics, etche
Oh, I imagine the worst sort of Mark-of-the-Beast-level corruption once these things get rolling, just not yet! ?
"If you love servitude greater than freedom, go home from us in peace. We seek not your counsel. Crouch down and lick the hand that feeds you; May your chains set lightly upon you, and may posterity forget that you were our countrymen." -Sam Adams
Computer programming is moving from complex to complicated and no one understands the inner workings enough to remove all the bugs. Not to worry: farmers never had legibility within the inner workings of their crops, but we made it through the Agricultural Age just fine.
When workable solutions are located far away from what makes you feel like you care, and passionate signaling is directing the eyeballs away from what you really care about
I see growth of administrative roles in Medicine and Education as unmitigated evils. I see Big Government as continuous immiseration. And yet, as a programmer, every completed code project is another digital bureaucracy. Bit shuffling is not much different than paper shuffling.?????
What color red is this? It looks like a certain flower ?
During a ship overhaul metal boxes would often be welded to the floor. Someone from the next shift would invariably trip over these things. It got to be, whenever someone would trip for any reason, we would say "careful, they just put that there!". I still say that to this day.
I wonder if there is a rundown on all the theological arguments against the more unprovable Fermi Paradox solutions
It’s much easier to discover, especially if you are passionate, what makes you FEEL virtuous, than what actually helps other people.
That is why the Dynasty Startup Kit™? cultivates using reason and cost-benefit analysis (as well as a strong motivation) to improve clan members’ well-being, instead of just relying on feelings of warmth, concern, and care for them.
"I needed clothes and you clothed me, I was sick and you looked after me, I was in prison and you came to visit me."
People, especially passionate people, are often distracted by what makes the FEEL virtuous, and are missing the idea that they may be just conceited.
Here’s one thing I taught my son well: always get ahead of trouble by immediately informing your employer when you harm the equipment
I have enough
The abundance-with-signaling mentality (over the survival mentality) seems to be analogous here. The complex novel phenotype being Wokeism.
The only chance I get to watch TV is in a motel room, and by “watch” I mean with the sound off, until I find a movie I like, where I get to experience periodic interruptions designed by eyeball-harvesting sociopaths, which means the sound gets muted again, and I’m back on Twitter
Here's to a great future!
I can envision a kind of ophanocratic takeover where the population is forced to make a choice to join a DAO or something
Whenever and wherever prices are not allowed to be set by auction (for instance where property rights are banned), if the price in money is capped the remaining price signal shows up in line length
They also give a clue as to what sci-fi special effects should REALLY be looking like
I created a graph for Jung in chronological layout, and it looks like a sail-less schooner with a mast at each saeculum:
I’d like to do an extension of the tribes graph, but following the forefathers back to their (mostly) Christian origins
I think the syncretized, and now atheized, descendant of Calvinism (passing thru the English Puritans to the New England Unitarians, Transcendentalists, Progressives et al) is at the root of this religious impulse. God is dead but humans evolved to fill the void with something.
I have this really simple math problem with some data that I can’t solve. Every time I show it on any social media, I get a religiously moralizing response.
“And I will make mere lads their princes, and capricious children will rule over them, and the people will be oppressed, each one by another, and each one by his neighbor; the youth will storm against the elder and the inferior against the honorable.”
Micah is a rich source of musings on the applicability and juxtaposition of Christianity to modern philosophy and scientific concepts
That's my excuse and I'm going to stick with it! :-)
"...only in epic poems are heroes humanly attractive. More usually in real life their dedication makes them unrelenting; their courage makes them overbearing; they are out of scale and therefore not amenable to ordinary mortal intercourse."nn~ Henry Kissinger
“A big challenge for progressivism is wrapping up a century-long messy divorce with Socialism.”
What did men in the previous century wear before they started wearing slacks? Taughts?
I've come to the conclusion that if give UBI wealth and social status to those who would otherwise be poor you will be rewarded with malignant narcissism for your compassion. Like that insufferable rich aunt, but on a universal scale.
Suffering is really knowledge of the true price of something. Willingness to suffer is truth seeking.
Man! These are great!
Reading this, I was hanging on to not spelling "lose" "loose" and not spelling "you're" "your". Good job, everybody.
Imagine what getting off a debased currency could do.
I love the Southern US “gratitude culture”: may it grow in power and flexibility.
Eating at Chicken Salad Chick! There’s a board on the wall with @jeffreyatucker ‘s name on it. @chickensaladchi
I need help. I have $50K in student loan debt, mounting medical bills, maxed out credit cards, and have given myself over to the pursuit of short term pleasures. Where can I get dedicated attention?
What makes taxation not theft?
This object lesson is lost on him, though, as he tries to get God to kill him when the shade is taken away. Finally God calls him out: “Are you really that angry?” “Yes! I’m angry enough to die!” “About a plant that you didn’t plant, that grew in a day and died in a day?”
He then leaves the city and makes himself a shelter, waiting to see whether or not the city will be destroyed. God grows a plant around it, giving him shade from the harsh sun, much like the city of Nineveh gives protection for the children and animals behind its walls.
The scene after the repentance shows the second contrast: Jonah doesn’t want to be made wrong by God’s mercifulness. Jonah wines that it was inevitable that God would turn from the threatened calamities, that’s why he went to Tarshish!
The king goes all out in sackcloth and ashes and decrees a fasting, sackcloth, prayer, and repentance lockdown (comically, even with the animals). The entire city is humbled and broken. God sees their repentant hearts and spares the city, for now.
What should I visit in Vermont?
God again commands Jonah to travel to Nineveh and prophesy to its inhabitants. Finally, he goes, wandering around the city crying “Forty days, and Nineveh. Shall be. DESTROYED!” By the time Jonah has walked across the city, the people begin to believe his word and declare a fast.
While in the sea monster, Jonah prays to God in his affliction and commits to thanksgiving and fulfilling what he has vowed. “When my life was fainting away, I remembered the Lord, and my prayer came to you, into your holy temple.” God then commanded the fish to vomit him out.
“The comic aspect (as Jonah goes to his extremes) [is that] he in fact anticipates the movement of Christ down into Hades, then back up and then ascending to Heaven, but he does so almost despite himself, whining and complaining as a parody of the actual meaning.” @PageauJonathan
I want to go off here on a tangent, given the extensive iconographic history of this story as a symbol of death and resurrection, the significance of the three days, and how the years 2020, 2021, and 2023 are going to be swallowed by their own monster.
Jonah is miraculously saved by being swallowed by a sea monster, in whose belly he spends three days and nights. “For just as Jonah was three days and three nights in the belly of the great fish, so will the Son of Man be three days and three nights in the heart of the earth.”
In contrast, Jonah just wants God to push the Divine Smite Button (on himself in this case). The sailors refuse at first and continue rowing, but all their efforts eventually fail and they are forced to cast him overboard. This calms the storm and the sailors offer God worship.
The scene on the ship shows the first contrast: the pagans are desperately trying to find a god that can save them, and don’t want to sacrifice someone, even if he is no kin of theirs and claims responsibility for the calamity.
In an elaborate, seemingly artificial plot twist, Jonah boards a ship to Tarshish to get far away from Nineveh as possible. Caught in no ordinary storm, the sailors cast lots and determine Jonah’s to blame. Jonah admits this and that if they cast him overboard, the sea will calm.
The Book of Jonah is a contrast comedy about a prophet who is repeatedly trying to kill himself and refusing to own up to his own responsibility. The central figure is called upon by God to travel to Nineveh and warn its inhabitants of impending divine wrath.
How do you say (in cat language) “I don’t speak cat”? We’re having this extended conversation all the time ?
Is that the kind that lives in clonal colonies and spreads by means of root suckers?
Justin Raimondo, the last of a now extinct breed
I find paperwork excruciating! I put it off to the last possible minute and have mental blocks about it when discussed in detail. It’s an API to these indeterminate “servers” which require I follow poorly understood protocols with complex feedback cycles
Every time I smoke cigars, my cat feels the need to lick my beard clean
Is today Juneteenth?
Everything that ends up surviving over multiple generations by getting copies of itself made is in the infinite game.
Okay, so now I’m thinking that overcentralization exposes an economy to political risks.
Happy Fathers Day twitter.
He can definitely hold his own against her theology degree, but I have to stop them occasionally and summarize each position when they start talking past each other
Why are you preventing property rights from extending to the air, water, and ocean? I could sue the hell out of somebody who polluted the breathed-in air I homesteaded
This is my Fathers Day: my son and I drink porters while he and my wife discuss theology and classical education
How about this: if you don’t go broke doing it, then it isn’t political.
This should be taught at the beginning of every grade school class in mathematics
What was your safe space when you were of college age? Mine was the USS Carl Vinson carrier group out in the Indian Ocean. I was able to incrementally overcome all my fears there
Is there a service out there for desperate people willing to live in prison, which can provide a means of conviction for these stupid crimes without being legally answerable? The entertainment value alone could provide a source of revenue
What do you prefer most in a politician?
This mechanism, but the fog of lies that causes social media players to coalesce into digital tribes
Using Reddit is like traveling through a jungle trying to avoid the wandering troops of monkeys. And, yes, their howling sometimes sounds like “That’s racist!” but mostly just sounds like “Your stupid” “No, your stupid” with grunt-like downvotes
Finally, someone not forcing their values on the homeless and calling it compassionate
Idiocracy is not just a funny movie, it’s a real threat
We need to get Christian concepts such as the stain of sin, purity and innocence back into the vocabulary of the analysis of identity politics
What’s a perfect way to mark those tweets where someone else just has to talk about something... even if the person on the other end of the conversation (in this case you) doesn't care at all? Not necessary, it’s already twitter
Like a sparrow in its flitting, like a swallow in its flying, a curse that is causeless does not alight. Proverbs 26:2
What 40000 Videos Tell Us About The Trending Tab
View my verified achievement from CompTIA on Acclaim: 
Very encouraging thread from a fellow PCA member from Nebraska:
I was just imagining how, in the mid 70s, I’d have to explain to the guy who runs the big offset printer how to print out blank spreadsheets that I could use to collect tabulated data.

Moving from service provider to moral fashion police has been a bad move for Twitter
I'm applying to the @HumanityDAO registry! My Ethereum address is 0x1c758bf0c7421800675bd54825024e559de1841c
Governor Little should start a podcast with his take on each chapter, explaining the political motivations of those who got them on the books
This word makes me feel small
?@peterboghossian? discovers that the void created by driving Christianity out of rational discourse has been filled by an anti-rational religion and that he actually has a lot in common with his old enemies 
Ophanocracies should be designed to overcome inherent human irrationality
The Univariate Fallacy explained and explored in a thread:
Hilarious thread
Fake linear regression model fit == Fake News
My answer to How do we address the lopsided distribution of wealth or capital in the U.S.A when the top 1% own upwards of 70% of the wealth and capital in the country?
This needs some thunder-like sound effects
My dog has performed his first “herbal cleanse” of the year where he eats grass then throws it up
Imagine a future scenario where NLP machines are able to fool an ever increasing number of journals. What criteria would you need to add to stop the misqualifications?
cc @wizardlabs
My son makes the finest quality vape juice money can buy
I added a notation for the most evil country:
But 30% more than 15% would be 40.5% by this calculation.
How about 80 + (100-80)*0.3 = 86%?
What's 30% more than 80%?
I play dozens of games of chess simultaneously. It generally feels like mass seduction (with the occasional fist fight). If the prey is too weak, it becomes a mop up operation. If too strong, I end up admiring their beauty.
"We knew Hitler was a vulgar and ignorant little cad, in addition to any other defects (or the source of them); but there seem to be many v. and i. l. cads who don't speak German, and who given the same chance would show most of the other Hitlerian characteristics." JRR Tolkien
Calf FlankernBusboynDishwashernReactor OperatornCouriernWeb DevelopernData Scientist
“What’s your degree in?”nn“Predictive Analytics”nn“What’s that?”nn“I can code better than a statistician and do statistics better than a software engineer.”
Since Satoshi's white paper, I've been dreaming of ophanocracies, decentralized "wheel within a wheel" governance mechanisms. It looks more like we are developing "nephilocracies" - monstrosities that appear right before a catastrophe as evidence that something is wrong.


Does everybody take it for granted that the All Presents Singularity that connects the Initial Singularity with the Final Singularity is infinitely close to all the multiverses? Because I don’t hear a peep from anyone about it.
Guess who’s going to pay for their own protection AND for patrolling the neighborhoods where their would-be perpetrators are forming?
This sounds like the plot to Atlas Shrugged!
What is the opposite of Neo-Marxist Postmodernism?
According to Liddell and Scott, a creed (like the Nicene Creed) “was called in Greek a ???????? (symbolon), which originally meant half of a broken object which, when fitted to the other half, verified the bearer's identity.” Sounds like public key cryptography!
My answer to Can you explain the downfall of Bitcoin?
It's my #Twitterversary! I have been on Twitter for 12 years (since 17 Mar 2007).nWhat's your #TwiAge?
This is March in 2019 - what happened to rainy January?
You can throw a random group of guys into a mild survival situation, and within a week they will be laughing together and having fun. What happens when you throw a random group of gals into that same situation?
I'm serious: the US minimum wage is classist. The union method of locking out the lesser-skilled is more decentralized.
Let's adopt Norway's 27 percent corporate tax rate, lack of government-imposed minimum wage, and low levels of protectionism.
Someone just posted on facebook: "My action through college channeled Donald Trump into the presidency." Is it contriteness? Or a call to violent action?
Better think about having kids:
It's possible that sexism or misogyny is not meaningfully falsifiable:
My answer to Why are so many young people attracted to socialism when all if the evidence shows it to be a failure?

“Remember for my good, O my God, all that I have done for this people.” Nehemiah 5:19nnNehemiah was a high-energy, massively productive individual who signaled honestly and costly his worth to the community. Was it selfish to seek a reward?
"In any case, to wear an improper expression on your face (to look incredulous when a victory was announced, for example) was itself a punishable offense. There was even a word for it in Newspeak: facecrime, it was called." (Orwell, 1984)
Infinite will to power
How do I increase my output? I am vastly open to new experiences but am really lazy. So I flit around like a butterfly ? but don’t hatch much.
What if they want to work for $3/hr? Why deny those not worth the minimum wage the dignity and personal agency to negotiate for themselves (or at least letting their unions do it)? This is not loving poor people, this is just hating rich people.
He distinguishes a right as a “special” privilege (at other people’s expense)
A lot of people in their twenties like to listen to classic rock - what was Top 40 when I was in high school. This is like a bunch of people from my generation listening to Bing Crosby and Perry Como in the eighties. But, "To Each His Own" (Eddy Howard).
We need to engineer a better method of keeping crypto projects on track than the current twitter blowups among team members. I propose duels ? which would be the cryptocurrency equivalent of the arm-fighter time contests in the In Time (2011) movie.
Merry Christmas! Christ is born! May the smoke alarm trumpet the massive amount of cooking you are doing. ?
That full moon is STILL looking awesome! I feel like I’m in a J.R.R. Tolkien tale.
2019 Goals:n1. Glorify God and enjoy Himn2. Get humanity through the next Great Filtern3. Prevent a WWII-like memetic contagion from happening in this saeculumn4. Develop the ophanocracies that would realize the dreams of the Left and Right without their authoritarianism
TL;DR: mythopoetics, metaphysics, and art
If you’re already a post-Christian Atheist, think about becoming an Atheist Christian. Dig through all the dogma/stories your ancestors evolved with and pull out stuff that will help us now. The antidote to memetic contagion is the Suffering Servant who willingly gets scapegoated
I think social media has reached the stage of Dante's Ninth Circle of Hell: each one gnawing the nape of the other's neck. Treachery. Don't believe in Hell? Act like one exists especially for you, and you may escape suffering from it.
As a programmer, subject matter-specific apps that help non-programmers speed up what I do by hand are fine, but when someone suggests to me that I use it, it's like "here's what someone smarter than you made to help you do something you're too stupid to figure out yourself"
This is unfair: women have to work more than eleven years to earn the same number of fatalities that men can rack up in just one
For decentralized algorithmic governance, I prefer the term "ophanocracy" over "algocracy". Ophanocracy is a play on the "if men were angels" argument of Federalist #51 using the "wheel within a wheel" angels - the ophanim - of Ezekiel 1:16.
Smashing religion is like smashing any other innate thing (like language). Language has so many contradictory elements and it poisons everything! So let's try to prevent people from using it, et al.
This is so rich!
Why is Christianity rapidly declining while Islam is rapidly spreading in western Europe? Will western Europe become a Muslim majority region? by Charlie Gabriel
The ability to voluntarily take on as much responsibility you can handle
Taking this pole had an unexpected effect on me: poised to give myself a low grade, I realize that my 18-year-old self would think all the things I've accomplished over the years was "totally awesome" and would consider me a hero! I'm suddenly feeling really good about myself.
Because as Americans we have succeeded so far in keeping governments impotent enough that it doesn’t matter who is elected
The scientist vastly simplifies the test compared to the centuries of use. It's possible that for certain genetic populations, it works with the least number of side effects that could be expressed over those centuries.
“What I know, is all I need to know.”  Milton’s Lucifer
You could argue that we added necessary complexity, but they would perceive the violations
You keep him in perfect peace whose mind is stayed on you, because he trusts in you. Isaiah 26:3
NPC == Kaczynskian oversocialization
The honeymoon is over, the culture shock is upon me. I’m surrounded by Progressives.
I used to own a LAN party starter kit, complete with about half a dozen laptops. I would host just my sons and their cousins. Great times!
Are there any anti-communist, pro-USA, pro-capitalist #Antifa forces left? We could use some.
nn@remindmetweets in 25 years
“Winston disliked nearly all women, and especially the young and pretty ones. It was always the women, and above all the young ones, who were the most bigoted adherents of the Party, the swallowers of slogans, the amateur spies and nosers-out of unorthodoxy.”nnGeorge Orwell, 1984
A man who despises himself nonetheless esteems himself, as a despiser. --Nietszche
A message of hope for you Democrats in your gun-controlled cities with your immune-from-prosecution police: the Army has centuries of experience distributing food and water in the presence of adversaries.
I don't know what to say.
Yeah, these are definitely lockdown riots
/r/atheism is dominated by these types. It’s impossible to get them to discuss non-Materialist atheists, for instance. The only point they can get across is how stupid you are for bringing it up.
The United States has a guns per 100 residents 7.2 standard deviations above the mean, but a murder rate 0.2 standard deviations below the mean.
Hence the need for minimal governance
It appears global centralization is a non-starter:
Incels are black-pilled, but this may give their lives some meaning. It’s a little like getting the resentful poor to agitate for the downfall of Capitalism, though.
Instead of picketing abortion clinics, where should they picket? What would cause the biggest bang for the buck?
If the Christian Right initiates an aggressive campaign against irresponsible ejaculators, would Feminists join? Would incels?
Those who know that they are profound strive for clarity. Those who would like to seem profound to the crowd strive for obscurity. For the crowd believes that if it cannot see to the bottom of something it must be profound. It is timid and dislikes going into the water.nNietzsche
I just published “Towards a less ‘marketing speak’ sounding word than ‘Futarchy’”
I just published “These are the combatants in the noosphere according to Peter Limberg and Conor Barnes’ memetic…”

When @jordanbpeterson tweets:
"Language is always picking up grime as it moves with us through the world - biases, misunderstandings, etc." The atheist not believing in "God" as a linguistic grime rejection from a truth-seeker of high disgust sensitivity.
I propose the term "ophanocracy" for a decentralized governance mechanism (GM). It is a play on the "if men were angels" argument in the Federalist #51 with the "wheel within a wheel" angels of Ezekiel 1:16.
Gender pay gap, minimum wage, et al
A Critique of Stephen Hicks' "Explaining Postmodernism"
After spending a few days on a business trip at a fancy hotel I always get the sensation of being trapped in a King Midas-like hell, forever isolated from family and home-cooked meals.

Taxi drivers have worse fatality rate than miners, almost as bad as cops
“Yet once more I will shake not only the earth but also the heavens.” This phrase indicates the removal of things that are shaken—that is, things that have been made—in order that the things that cannot be shaken may remain. Heb 12:26-27
"You can't script the life of a genius from the outside. It must be built by the individual himself or herself, and in ways that inevitably defy the norm."
I'm not talking about something facile achieved by legerdemain. Those would be anti-Christ. I'm peering through the fog of the singularity where I see recapitulated every superstitious notion mankind has ever had.
We need a technological savior to take on the burden of our accidental complexity - some sort of abstraction to hide the infinite information from ourselves.
Word Study:  I wonder how this Avon/Anomia concept relates to the Software Crisis and the overall complexity of the development process. Perhaps eternal hell turns out to be just us trapped in a crooked technological singularity of our own making.

Every project I work on I have to go relearn some math and while coding I have to google how to do basic stuff.

Happy Marginal Utility Day!
Based on my personality traits, my secret nationality is Estonian. Find out what yours is at  via @BBC_Future
My dream is to retro-incarnate up my patriline to the point where my tribe reacts like my ancestor has been bewitched
"It’s like the rush you get when, as a kid, you’d say a bad word out loud in public."
What is the total government cost per year of our starvationcare system?
“The extreme greatness of Christianity lies in the fact that it does not seek a supernatural remedy for suffering but a supernatural use for it.” Simone Weil
It’s a technique to ensure you’re hearing it correctly and it was spoken to you correctly
There's a reason that justice should be simple.
You are a multi-billion-year-old cosmic evolutionary process becoming aware of itself: what is the first thing you do?
"Who, in the days of His flesh, when He had offered up prayers and supplications, with vehement cries and tears to Him who was able to save Him from death, and was heard because of His godly fear, though He was a Son, yet He learned obedience by the things which He suffered."
And we've had centuries to test out the modifications.
Unschooling is the most difficult of teaching methods as you have to be constantly on top of your motivations game.
It's only a super power if it can be used for evil.
How many deep learning researchers does it take to screw in a light bulb? One, but they need at least ten million well-labeled examples to achieve human-level accuracy.
#ophanocracy
I just woke up from a dream where what appeared before my eyes was some really beautiful code that I understood very well and was excited to implement. I am satisfied that this was just random stuff I imposed structure on because it fixed a bug.
I thought, maybe, no, but then I read the titles. I must have the electronic versions of all of these somewhere and have put them down to memory. :-)
Don’t forget the supply/demand denialists
Interesting take on Medieval feminism:
Our first meetup!  #Meetup #Concord via @Meetup
Trust in the One who voluntarily takes the place of the scapegoat, or disintegrate into mimetic violence.
This is a good metaphor for the @jordanbpeterson phenomenon.
What are the dark secrets of crypto? by Marius Kramer
The Kaluza–Klein theory of political space: empathy and compassion are real dimensions, they are just curled up in orbifolds. They don't scale well past the family level.
“And I, if I am lifted up from the earth, will draw all men to Myself.” John 12:32
Updating using OAuth authentication via Tweepy!
This is a good way to look at it sans character.
"Get back on the plantation!" is basically what their message is.
As if we weren't vulnerable enough, assassination technology gets better, faster, cheaper.
How did they do it? How did they end up reaching pre-modern, pre-traditional levels of imagination?
About 99% of us would, if the social pressure was great enough.
There a lot of Demand/Supply Denialists out there
Joel Simon has Evolving Floorplans:
This is basically me watching people make small talk
Unfortunately she never mentioned the power of property rights to transform poachers into ranchers:
"The individual has always had to struggle to keep from being overwhelmed by the tribe. If you try it, you will be lonely often, and sometimes frightened. But no price is too high to pay for the privilege of owning yourself." Friedrich Nietzsche
It's called "sufficing".
"I have found that, to make a contented slave, it is necessary to make a thoughtless one. It is necessary to darken his moral and mental vision, and, as far as possible, to annihilate the power of reason." Fredrick Douglass
We started a Jordan Peterson Meetup in the Boston Area  via @reddit
Jesus Christ: the Solution to Mimetic Violence
Rule #8 Tell the truth. Or at least don’t lie.
With the purified you deal purely, and with the crooked you make yourself seem tortuous. 2 Sam 22:27
Being the poorest in a status market that values displays of disposable income is what drives the aggressive to desperate measures in a dignity culture
The meek shall inherit the earth.
I think my cat is reciting some sort of cat poetry: he is taking various poses during his vociferations
Whoever thus serves Christ is acceptable to God and approved by men. So then let us pursue what makes for peace and for mutual upbuilding. Romans 14:18-19
I just want to apologize for putting off working on Goal #5: Found ophanocracies to ameliorate wage-slave riots. We're basically at the "Riots go Brrr" stage and that's not going to stop until people feel like doing nothing is okay again.
It turns out it’s double counting
Private cops are a lot less violent. I hope everybody understands why: because they can be fired, because their companies can lose business. The government police agencies can never go bankrupt; they even get more money for their screwups.
X: “I’m an atheist”nMe, the Loving Troll: “A Christian Atheist”nX: “God doesn’t exist”nMe: “Yes! Unless God is everything that is, God doesn’t exist.”nX: “I don’t believe in God”nMe: “You act like God transcends both existence and non-existence, and your message is important.”
Could someone explain this? This is CDC data on pneumonia deaths in 2020. It's not counted as COVID-19 deaths.
Happy Y chromosome day! Happy patrilineal appreciation day.
Guess what? Your personal temperament largely predicts your political ideology. So, how are you going to force your winner-take-all politics on everybody else if they each have their own mutually-incompatible ideology? There is a simple solution: border-less ophanocracies.
This falls under "free beta testing" I think. The criminal element is helping to harden the security of and game-proof crypto because they expect to be lied to and scammed.
Then the righteous will answer him, "Lord, when did we see you hungry and feed you, or thirsty and give you something to drink? When did we see you a stranger and invite you in, or needing clothes and clothe you?"
Kind of like an NPC?
If the mercy is true, you must therefore bear the true, not an imaginary sin. God does not save those who are only imaginary sinners. Be a sinner, and let your sins be strong (sin boldly), but let your trust in Christ be stronger, and rejoice in Christ who is the victor over sin.
Twitter, where expert cake makers argue with those who don't eat cakes.
Among the rich countries, the US has double the dissatisfaction of the others. Why?
Better: "One, but she needs at least a million well-labelled examples to achieve human-level accuracy."
Freedom in general, skin-in-the-game in particular:
What do you think of the rigor of this test? You meet a person who is passionate about a subject, and has moral judgments about society in reference to it. You agree on a measure per year, and ask them what year it peaked. If they don’t know, they’re virtue signaling.
I don't speak cat. But the cat thinks I do.
Why it’s important that the Reasonable Left identify its ideological limits (where the Left goes too far):
Ophanocracies will enable this
There is no fixed supply of facebooks either. The same logic applies to social media platforms.
The fog of lies is so thick people are using mean shift clustering to figure out who the good guys are.
On the New York Times and “Enforced Monogamy”
Thread
The rich get richer and the poor get richer:
So, I was yelling at Twitter, when...
So, I was outside near a bunch of groundskeepers reading twitter when the leaf blower stopped and the guy staring at me said “what did you say?” I tried to correct his perfectly reasonable misunderstanding that I was talking to him. “I know.” Continues to stare at me. #busted
Panchreston n. A proposed explanation intended to address a complex problem by trying to account for all possible contingencies but typically proving to be too broadly conceived and therefore oversimplified to be of any practical use.  via @dictionarycom
1234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890
I like the irony of using appeals to authority in the third pane. But the phrase "well, the bible says" has made it through hundreds of years of intellectual fads: it will make it through this one as well.
Men rate women's attractiveness on a normal curve and over-message the hottest, women rank almost all men as ugly and message the ones they think are slightly out of their league:
What does fairness mean to you?
Legislator: What just happened? nViscount Halifax: He mobilized the English language and sent it into battle. #IMDb
"The most improper job of any man, even saints, is bossing other men. Not one in a million is fit for it, and least of all those who seek the opportunity." J. R. R. Tolkien
Represent
"What is freedom of expression? Without the freedom to offend, it ceases to exist. Without the freedom to challenge, even to satirize all orthodoxies, it ceases to exist. Language and the imagination cannot be imprisoned, or art dies." Bhikhu Parekh
Verifying my identity on  0x564cd933d2dd8f8169541eefe1e0efe6e2902b00
Everybody's speculating about sex-bots: I'm looking forward to the advent of citizen-bots. The politically lustful will be able to force these bots to follow complicated regulations, imprison them for their innovations, etc., satisfying their Utopian urges without harm.
Pointing out the inconsistencies in a long-established religion is like pointing out the biochemical mess in highly evolved life. Yes, that protein was just split, then re-assembled, for seemingly no purpose. That doesn't negate the validity of that particular organism.
"The State is said by some to be a necessary evil; it must be made unnecessary."nBenjamin Tucker
"Mediocrity recognizes nothing above itself." Sir Arthur Conan Doyle
The reason I don't put tattoos on my body (or even a bumper stickers on my car) is that I don't want to be permanently labeled with whatever idea I'm stumbling forward with in the present. And yet here I am...
I think Maher would do better having a one-on-one with Dr. Peterson using the presenting problem of “I despise my audience and find my panel a little too sycophantic”
Also retweet the importance of saving for the future
We need to re-evaluate what it means to be an expert.
I've submitted this to Reddit for critiquing:  - it started out well, but I ended up just riling up the mob.
thread
Public officials and their unions also have financial incentives:
I got the text for this example from  - a great place to find both sides of an argument.
“All men are born equally free,” and possess “certain inherent natural rights, of which they cannot, by any compact, deprive or divest their posterity.”n—George Mason, Father of the Bill of Rights
This is promising: can we expand further?
Here is someone who put his money where his mouth is: Christ-like, prophetic, diametrically opposite of a virtue signaler. A living, breathing, social justice warrior.
The only entity in the household that informs me that the dog's water bowl is empty is the cat.
So F, U, V, W, and Y all came from the same Phoenician letter?
Okay, I just went to  and I don't think the above Bible quote is at the same point in the timeline anymore.
This is truly outrageous, but I predict mob justice won’t be channeled here because it can’t be leveraged by the power hungry.
When your ideology so reinforces your resentment that you have to start acting it out:
How do you integrate religion into your life?
This is search interest over time normalized so that the max is at 100. People are searching on Google for "facebook" less probably because they know how to get there now.
I’m technically thinking of “regret minimization” approaches, where you and your follows converge to a correlated equilibrium. I hope this is the correct term, anyway.
If you and all your follows became twitter refugees, what equivalent would end up as your Nash equilibrium?
StackOverflow 2018 survey results:
It's #MyTwitterAnniversary! I have been on Twitter for 11 years (since 17 Mar 2007).nAnd you?
Tulip against a backdrop of snow.
Today, from the Westminster confession, we read that a sacrament is a “seal”. The modern version of a seal is the digital signature (from the study of communicating in the presence of adversaries). Both seal and signature provide authentication, non-repudiation, and integrity.
"I will feed your oppressors with their own flesh, And they will become drunk with their own blood as with sweet wine; And all flesh will know that I, the LORD, am your Savior And your Redeemer, the Mighty One of Jacob." Isaiah 49:26
Dershowitz explains how dangerous the alt-right is:  (forgive the cheerleading by the interviewer)
Government welfare is not charity:
How do I go about sponsoring one of these refugees?
And hiring workers for a guaranteed wage/salary, while hers is not.
I try to be an agreeable person in business meetings, but every time I do I regret it.
People who are urgent in their intersectionality do not tolerate a cross-entropy greater than zero in their in-group
Bouchell seems conscientious and intelligent: he doesn’t sound like he’s trying to perpetuate a lie. He’s doomed.
My black lab is completely unaware of the fact that other beings (the cat, the humans) might want to stay dry of dog slobber.
Ophanocracies to the rescue!
This caused me to be aghast at what she is getting at and might be of existential importance:
The world is made out of
"Falsehood advertises itself and seeks supporters. Truth is honored in  being despised, and saves those who are able to recognize its worth." Archimandrite Vasileios
I just noticed it's above $10K again. :-)
“No scientist builds a theory from 0.37 standard deviations.” A practical study in the deceptiveness of long tails.
"I ask you to consider three medical miracles we take for granted:  X-rays, cardiac catheterization, and general anesthesia. I contend all  three would be stillborn if we tried to deliver them in 2005."
Notes on the transfer from Omaha to Boston:nn1) Roads: Omaha has consistent width standards, orthoganality, etc. (Boston grew organically from cow trails.)nn2) I’m realizing I’ve picked up the habit of saying hi to strangers I walk by.
Which would you rather have?
I’m assuming here that ophanocracies programmatically/architecturally eliminate a lot of the rent seeking. Hence, the greater complexity.
I think the opportunity here is: can you be a Minister of Reconciliation? Can you ride the hundred-foot wave through the channel? Can you get us to the other side?
Every Rubin Report Ever | FreedomToons  via @YouTube
"For starters, he was literally Hitler, before that was common." ?
“Simon, Simon, behold, Satan has demanded permission to sift you like wheat; but I have prayed for you, that your faith may not fail.”
It would be great if you could cite a paper or two that demonstrates the inevitable destabilization of systems of competing creative agents. We have the resentful and the rent seekers clouding the issue.
We treated our boys like crap during Vietnam and are trying to make up for that. But the consensus, including among our war fighters, is not that of unconditional respect.
Arizona: a ray of sunshine in an otherwise bureaucrats-change-what-time-it-is kind of world
The Adjective-Profession-Name formulation and “No Living Heroes” theory explained:
So probably personal core integrity like not lying to yourself/others accounts for a larger percentage of long-term success?
Capitalists aren't selfish and greedy. They're empathetic:
I would say Cathy did an efficient and thorough job of bringing up all the points her viewers would.
From Alexander Schmemann: "The reduction of life exclusively to structures, impersonal and objective, is the sin of the male world." And further, "The main mistake of contemporary feminism is the acceptance of these structures: fighting for one’s place" in them.
A lot of things crypto assume omnicompetence - that the entire population of users can memorize and regurgitate numerous complex character strings at will.
I messed around with the data a little bit:   - I'll work on it some more later.
Watch: Cathy Newman’s catastrophic interview with Jordan Peterson
The tribe had a Minecraft going-away party for us:
When we went to bed, it was “a flesh-stinging cold and a bitter wind”. Now it’s just minus seventeen. No poetic descriptions possible.
Check this #opensource #SkillProject by @dariospagnolo and @springroleinc. Crowdsourced list of the dwindling skills humans still have!
Corp dudes: implement this
My dog isn’t a whiner, UNLESS THERE’S A HALF-EMPTY WATER BOTTLE SITTING THERE then he insists you give it to him so he can chew on it
Verizon JetPacks are very slow:
Take up your cross, integrate your shadow, and radiate the potential for havoc:
"In his errors a man is true to type. Observe the errors and you will know the man" ~ Analects
“I will play for higher stakes than you will” - Integrated Aggression vs Cowardice Disguised as Morality  via @YouTube
When she said her second line in the movie, I was like "I assumed she just had a bit part ?". When she moved the plot line a second time, I was thinking "I assumed she'd be off screen by now ?." When she helped her partner grow as a human being I was truly glad she was there.
Programming rules for how punctuation and quotation marks interact preserve the scope of the quoted section and we programmers are adopting the convention in our English writing
I still remember 2017 like it was yesterday
You could come directly from the outdoors today into a walk-in freezer and feel warmer. Source: me
Start GitHub repository of all my deep learning projects; take more Coursera classes
So an HR Bot just locked me out of my laptop
During a transfer at the company I work for, I was inadvertently “fired” and rehired. Enter the HR Bots, who have spooled off a dizzying array of “terminated employee” and “new employee” processes that have spammed my inbox.
Ahriman is the devil you know, just saying...
Technically I lost the private key to a wallet. It was the only copy. I was not clear on the concept of keeping backups
3 cases of whooping cough at our daycare
We’re having a harder time this year telling the difference between rigorous social sciences terminology and ideologically motivated slurs and epistemological manipulations.
When will #Coinbase get in the “too big to fail” zone?
The S &amp; P data points were all averaged, so that's probably why the volatility metric is so low
I did the sd log standard of volatility (over roughly the same time period from the opening of #Coinbase to the present) on a few select datasets: the #SP500 was 0.08, #Walmart was 0.11, and #Bitcoin was 1.22!
The institution of slavery was defended using social contract arguments:nhttps://t.co/euZo0rTWCl
Nobody wants to hear this but if you'd just put $5 a week into #coinbase since it opened you'd have $USD 20K right now
I refer to it as demand/supply denialism, but I’m open to better labels.
The free market is always more responsive to the needs of the customer.
"Sure, you can print out a bitcoin on a piece of paper" - actually, you are just printing out the public key of a wallet. It could be empty.
Reddit has been blanketed with Net Neutrality activism
I saw this in my browser toolbar and got a little thrill:
Mask: Socialism, Underneath: Will to Negate Life
Yeah, I remember Nick’s pessimism about it. But he is ALWAYS cranky. :-)
"[There] is an increasing tendency among modern men to imagine themselves ethical  because they have delegated their vices to larger and larger groups." Hayek
"It seems to be almost a law of human nature that it is easier for people to agree on a negative program — on the hatred of an enemy, on the envy of those better off — than on any positive task." Hayek
“Why do I put parentheses around the if and return predicates?!? You betrayed me with print!! I will never! Trust you! Again!” Something like that. :-)
A rude awakening to the sometimes necessary inclusion of parentheses
“Guided by the finger, [a] person should see the moon. If he looks at the finger instead and mistakes it for the moon, he loses not only the moon but the finger also. Why? It is because he mistakes the pointing finger for the bright moon.” Shurangama
Then there’s Dave Winer, who wrote UserLand Frontier and developed RSS
So, students have to be kept unaware of their exposure in order not to be considered blocked? You need a certain number of “useful idiots”?
Don’t forget the supply/demand denialists
“I have only ever made one prayer to God, a very short one: ‘O Lord, make my enemies ridiculous.’ And God granted it.” Voltaire
Science is about personal honesty:
There's a patch of grass near where I live where many apartment dwellers take their pets to urinate. I'm telling you: it's Twitter for dogs!
“Everyone thinks of changing society and nobody thinks of changing himself” — Leo Tolstoy
Who do you prefer?
There’s only one way to improve society. Present it with a single improved unit: yourself. — Albert Jay Nock
So their logic is “Exchanges get hacked therefore Banks (with private blockchains) won’t get hacked”?
The time for ophanocracy has arrived:
The path from tolerance to SJWism:
Where does one find all necessary principles of knowledge and criteria of truth and meaning?
"It is easy to be 'conspicuously compassionate' if others are being forced to pay the cost." Murray Rothbard
"Laws must protect us" - sounds naive. Maybe you could clarify.
There is no great intelligence without some touch of madness. Aristotle
IQ is of predictive power for individual socioeconomic and national outcomes, it varies among races, and it can be reliably measured.
I'm pretty sure you can buy birth control at Target for like $9 a month. But if you remove enough market signals, Bernie...
There are... positions which must not be contested, commands of the sovereign which must not be obeyed. Sun Tzu
"They have sealed her in a cave, and I fear there is no going back."
Theodicy for Authoritarians: "Why do bad things happen to good governments?"
Internet memes are just baby ? Jungian archetypes evolved in the age of social media
Look upon my enemies, for they are many, And they hate me with violent hatred:
Things more disrespectful to the American Flag than kneeling:
Let me stump for monogamy here: it takes a lot of time for a man to learn one particular way (involving a lot of interpersonal skills, etc.)
Invigilator: A person who supervises students during an examination; a proctor
That's a reason we have the best "starvationcare" system
"Find the heaviest weight you can and pick it up. And that will make you strong. You’re not who you could be."
What's better: GLM or Decision Trees?
Solzhenitsyn: "The battleline between good and evil runs through the heart of every man."
[A] cultivated intellect, a delicate taste, a candid, equitable, dispassionate mind, a noble and courteous bearing in the conduct of life
The top entry is the hotel we are staying in; the bottom one is the StarBucks a few steps away
"Now, in his heart, Ahab had some glimpse of this, namely: all my means are sane, my motive and my object mad." Herman Melville, Moby Dick
Simple solution: allow bank to create savings plans that include a chance to win $$
Lack of an unlicensed, decentralized, pay-as-you-go healthcare industry?
I've tts'd all 30 hours of the Federalist Papers, and after numerous failed attempts, have concluded that you can't quote it on twitter.
No idea is too insane to be off limits to a group infected with a longing to rule:
"The LORD tests the righteous and the wicked, and the one who loves violence His soul hates." Psalms 11:5
"And if thou gaze long into an abyss, the abyss will also gaze into thee." Nietzsche
"He who fights with monsters, should be careful lest he thereby become a monster." Nietzsche
"And 'Will to Equality'—that itself shall henceforth be the name of virtue; and against all that hath power will we raise an outcry!"
"Vengeance will we use, and insult, against all who are not like us"—thus do the tarantula-hearts pledge themselves. Zarathrusta
Pepe is the "Mirror of Galadriel" for the victim culture. The right is getting too complex for the usual label-and-dismiss thing I guess.
How do you define "poverty"? We have the richest "poor" people the world has ever seen (in the economies with all the wealthy entrepreneurs)
Bayesian inference: when you can never be absolutely certain.
“Science is the Belief in the Ignorance of Experts” — Richard Feynman
The California National Guard can take the EU in a drill weekend:
Timeless
The purpose of government is to limit your competition:
I propose that the 5-9 year old girls are just innocent bystanders.
Tastes just like those large cans of fizzy fruity alcoholic drinks you buy at the gas station:
Sweden, Denmark, Iceland, Norway, et al, have no legal minimum wage, but of course they're distressed hell holes of concentrated poverty. /s
Is the OT really more focused on hate than love? I did a simple word count of the KJV:
"Over 90% of disinvitation attempts over racial..., gender, immigration, Islam, and local politics... were from the left of the speaker."
Before twitter, politicians took months to contradict themselves in print:
After the storm:
